Utah statutes.
67-1-3.   Removal of gubernatorial appointee.
(1)  Any time during a recess of the Legislature, the governor may remove any
gubernatorial appointee for official misconduct, habitual or willful neglect
of duty, or for other good and sufficient cause.
(2)  If the appointment required consent of the Senate, the governor may fill
the vacancy created by the removal by following the procedures and
requirements of Section 67-1-1.5.
